Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-503.01
Real property less than five thousand dollars; sale; procedure.

Section 17-503 shall not apply to the sale of real property if the authorizing resolution directs the sale of real property, the total fair market value of which is less than five thousand dollars. Following passage of the resolution directing the sale of the property, notice of the sale shall be posted in three prominent places within the city or village for a period of not less than seven days prior to the sale of the property. The notice shall give a general description of the property offered for sale and state the terms and conditions of sale. Confirmation of the sale by passage of an ordinance may be required.

Laws 1982, LB 909, § 5;

Laws 1995, LB 197, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 476, § 2.